Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.650

Diversity in clinical trials.

If at any time Washington State University receives funding from the national institutes of health to conduct clinical trials of drugs or medical devices, Washington State University shall adopt a policy concerning the identification and recruitment of persons who are members of underrepresented demographic groups to participate in clinical trials of drugs and medical devices. This policy must include requirements to:

(1) Adopt a policy concerning the identification and recruitment of persons who are members of underrepresented demographic groups to participate in clinical trials. This policy must include requirements that investigators who are conducting clinical trials collaborate with community-based organizations and use methods recognized by the United States food and drug administration to identify and recruit such persons to participate in those clinical trials;

(2) Provide information to trial participants in languages other than English;

(3) Provide translation services or bilingual staff for trial screening;

(4) Provide culturally specific recruitment materials alongside general enrollment materials; and

(5) Provide electronic consent when not prohibited by the granting entity or federal regulations.

[ 2023 c 426 s 9.]